District of Columbia statutes.
7-503.04

Impact statements.

All heads of departments and agencies of the District government are required at least 30 days prior to implementation of any proposed policies or programs that will have a major impact on the aged to submit such proposals to the Director for comment. If the impact of the proposal is determined by the Director to be adverse, he shall file a statement of this finding with the Mayor, the Commission, and the Council of the District of Columbia, as well as the originating department or agency.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title III, § 304, 22 DCR 2459
1981 Ed., § 6-2214.
1973 Ed., § 6-1714.